District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-3607

Filing of sales and advertising literature.

Repealed.

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 625, Pub. L. 88-503, § 8
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(a)(2), 44 DCR 1730
Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-203, § 804(a), 47 DCR 7837

History

1981 Ed., § 2-2607.
1973 Ed., § 2-2407.

Prior Codifications